Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2456
Successor personal representative.

Parts 3 and 4 of this article govern proceedings for appointment of a personal representative to succeed one whose appointment has been terminated. After appointment and qualification, a successor personal representative may be substituted in all actions and proceedings to which the former personal representative was a party, and no notice, process or claim which was given or served upon the former personal representative need be given to or served upon the successor in order to preserve any position or right the person giving the notice or filing the claim may thereby have obtained or preserved with reference to the former personal representative. Except as otherwise ordered by the court, the successor personal representative has the powers and duties in respect to the continued administration which the former personal representative would have had if his appointment had not been terminated.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 134, UPC § 3-613.

Under this section and section 3-309 of the Uniform Commercial Code, a successor personal representative may enforce a lost note made payable to his or her decedent if the successor proves by clear and convincing evidence that (1) the predecessor personal representative was in possession of the notes and entitled to enforce them when the loss of possession occurred; (2) the loss of possession was not the result of a voluntary transfer by predecessor or lawful seizure; and (3) possession of the notes cannot be obtained because they were either destroyed, their whereabouts cannot be determined, or they are in the wrongful possession of an unknown person or a person who cannot be found or is not amenable to service of process. Fales v. Norine, 263 Neb. 932, 644 N.W.2d 513 (2002).